Georgia statutes. TITLE 31 Health
Article 7 Disclosure of Treatment of Alzheimer’s Disease or Alzheimer’s Related Dementia

Cross references.

Immediate investigation for missing person with Alzheimer’s disease, §

35-1-8

.

Georgia family caregiver support, T. 49, C. 6, A. 6.

Editor’s notes.

By resolution (Ga. L. 2009, p. 400), the General Assembly established the Alzheimer’s Disease and Other Dementias Task Force, which was abolished on June 30, 2010 by the terms of such resolution.

Law reviews.

For note on the 1995 enactment of this article, see 12 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 234 (1995).

31-8-180.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Alzheimer’s disease” or “Alzheimer’s related dementia” means a progressive, degenerative disease or condition that attacks the brain and results in impaired memory, thinking, and behavior.

“Care,” “treatment,” and “therapeutic activities” shall not include the sole activity of marketing, selling, manufacturing, or dispensing medication which is approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration and prescribed by a person licensed to practice medicine in accordance with Chapter 34 of Title 43 and informational or support services related to the use of such medication.

“Department” means the Department of Community Health.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-8-180

, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 841, § 1; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 4-14/HB 214.

Cross references.

Alzheimer’s and Related Dementias State Plan, T. 49, C. 6, Art. 8.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1995, a hyphen was deleted between “Alzheimer’s” and “related” in paragraph (1).

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

31-8-181.
Individuals and hospitals excluded from application of article.

This article shall not apply to the following:

An individual licensed to practice medicine under the provisions of Chapter 34 of Title 43, and persons employed by such an individual, provided that any nursing home, personal care home as defined by Code Section 31-6-2, hospice as defined by Code Section 31-7-172, respite care service as defined by Code Section 49-6-72, adult day program, or home health agency owned, operated, managed, or controlled by a person licensed to practice medicine under the provisions of Chapter 34 of Title 43 shall be subject to the provisions of this article; or

A hospital. However, to the extent that a hospital’s nursing home, personal care home as defined by Code Section 31-6-2, hospice as defined by Code Section 31-7-172, respite care service as defined by Code Section 49-6-72, adult day program, or home health agency holds itself out as providing care, treatment, or therapeutic activities for persons with Alzheimer’s disease or Alzheimer’s related dementia as part of a specialty unit, such nursing home, personal care home, hospice, respite care service, adult day program, or home health agency shall be subject to the provisions of this article.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-8-181

, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 841, § 1.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1995, a hyphen was deleted from between “Alzheimer’s” and “related” in paragraph (2).

31-8-182.
Disclosure of care, treatment, or therapeutic activities required; disclosure form.

Any entity, facility, program, or any instrumentality of the state or political subdivision of the state other than those excluded by Code Section 31-8-181 which advertises, markets, or offers to provide specialized care, treatment, or therapeutic activities for one or more persons with a probable diagnosis of Alzheimer’s disease or Alzheimer’s related dementia shall disclose the form of care, treatment, or therapeutic activities provided beyond that care, treatment, or therapeutic activities provided to persons who do not have a probable diagnosis of Alzheimer’s disease or Alzheimer’s related dementia.

The disclosure required by subsection (a) of this Code section shall be made in writing on the disclosure form provided for by subsection (c) of this Code section and provided to any person seeking information concerning placement in or care, treatment, or therapeutic activities from the entity, facility, program, or the instrumentality of the state or of a political subdivision of the state other than those excluded by Code Section 31-8-181.

With input from persons and organizations with experience or expertise regarding care, treatment, or therapeutic activities for persons who have Alzheimer’s disease or Alzheimer’s related dementia, the department shall develop a standard disclosure form. The disclosure shall be made on such form. The entity, facility, program, or the instrumentality of the state or a political subdivision of the state other than those excluded by Code Section 31-8-181 shall revise the disclosure form whenever significant changes are made.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-8-182

, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 841, § 1.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1995, a hyphen was deleted from between “Alzheimer’s” and “related” in subsections (a) and (c).

31-8-183.
Areas covered by disclosure requirements.

The disclosure required by Code Section 31-8-182 shall explain the specialized care, treatment, or therapeutic activities provided to patients, residents, or participants with Alzheimer’s disease or Alzheimer’s related dementia in each of the following areas:

The overall philosophy and mission of the entity, facility, program, or of the instrumentality of the state or of a political subdivision of the state other than those excluded by Code Section 31-8-181 which reflects the needs of patients or residents with Alzheimer’s disease or Alzheimer’s related dementia;

The processes for accepting patients, residents, or participants into the entity, facility, program, or into the instrumentality of the state or of a political subdivision of the state; for discharging patients, residents, or participants from the entity, facility, program, or from the instrumentality of the state or of a political subdivision of the state other than those excluded by Code Section 31-8-181; and for handling emergency situations;

The processes used for defining the programs of services of that entity, facility, program, or of that instrumentality of the state or of a political subdivision of the state other than those excluded by Code Section 31-8-181, including the method by which the program of services responds to changes in the patient’s, resident’s, or participant’s needs;

Staffing, staff training, and continuing education practices;

Description of the physical environment including safety and security features;

The frequency and types of activities for patients, residents, or participants;

The involvement of the entity, facility, program, or of the instrumentality of the state or of a political subdivision of the state other than those excluded by Code Section 31-8-181 with families and family support programs; and

The charge structure of the specialized care, treatment, or therapeutic activities, including any additional fees.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-8-183

, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 841, § 1.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1995, a hyphen was deleted from between “Alzheimer’s” and “related” in paragraph (1).

31-8-184.
Failure to provide disclosure; review and verification of disclosure form.

Failure to provide disclosure as required by this article shall be considered a violation of Part 2 of Article 15 of Chapter 1 of Title 10, the “Fair Business Practices Act of 1975,” and all public and private remedies available under such part shall be available with regard to a violation of this article.

Within existing procedures, the department may examine the disclosure form required by this article to verify its accuracy. If determined to be inaccurate, the department shall require the entity, facility, program, or the instrumentality of the state or of a political subdivision of the state other than those excluded by Code Section 31-8-181 either to:

Provide the specialized care, treatment, or therapeutic activities listed on the disclosure form; or

Modify the disclosure form to reflect the specialized care, treatment, or therapeutic activities actually being offered.

The entity, facility, program, or the instrumentality of the state or of a political subdivision of the state other than those excluded by Code Section 31-8-181 will make the decision of which alternative listed in paragraph (1) or (2) of this subsection to pursue. Action by the department in pursuit of this subsection shall not affect the licensing process for any entity, facility, program, or the instrumentality of the state or of a political subdivision of the state other than those excluded by Code Section 31-8-181.

For the purposes of the review and verification referred to in subsection (b) of this Code section, the disclosure form being provided to the public at the time of the review and verification shall be used.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-8-184

, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 841, § 1.